Arkansas, session 2025, SB183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 18, Subchapter 16 is amended
to read as follows:
Subchapter 16 — Universal ACT Assessment Program Act

6-18-1601. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Universal ACT
Assessment Program Act”.

6-18-1602. Definitions Definition.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “ACT Assessment” "Assessment" means a test of student
educational development that measures student readiness for future learning
and that may be used by institutions of higher education as part of their
admissions, placement, and scholarship processes and by high schools to
*TNL050*
03-04-2025 14:06:59 TNL050

As Engrossed: S2/4/25 S2/25/25 S2/25/25 S3/4/25 SB183
improve college and workforce readiness; and
(2) “Smart Core” means:
(A) The college and career readiness curriculum by that
name under the rules of the State Board of Education; or
(B) A college and career readiness curriculum that is:
(i) Established by rules of the state board in
coordination with the Division of Higher Education; and
(ii) Substituted for the curriculum named “Smart
Core”.
(B) "Assessment" includes without limitation:
(i) The ACT test;
(ii) The SAT;
(iii) The CLT;
(iv) The PreACT;
(v) The PSAT 8/9;
(vi) The PSAT 10;
(vii) The Preliminary SAT/National Merit Scholarship
Qualifying Test;
(viii) The CLT 10; or
(ix) The PreACT 8/9; and
(2) "CLT" means the Classic Learning Test administered by Class
Learning Initiatives, LLC.

6-18-1603. Creation.
There is created in the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
the Universal ACT Assessment Program to be developed, implemented, and
administered by the division as provided in this subchapter.

6-18-1604. Purpose.
The purpose of the Universal ACT Assessment Program is to:
(1) Improve the college readiness of all students in grade
eleven (11);
(2) Prevent or minimize the continued remediation of nearly
fifty percent (50%) of all students entering Arkansas institutions of higher
education in one (1) or more subjects because they do not meet the college
recommended readiness score of nineteen (19) or higher on the ACT Assessment
03-04-2025 14:06:59 TNL050

As Engrossed: S2/4/25 S2/25/25 S2/25/25 S3/4/25 SB183
an assessment;
(3) Advance the number of students, including students of low
income, English-language learners, and minority students, taking the ACT
Assessment an assessment while in grade eleven (11) to increase the number of
first-generation college students;
(4) Increase the college participation rates among all racial
and ethnic groups;
(5) Improve preparation for college and the workforce;
(6) Improve the course selection patterns of high school
students;
(7) Increase the early identification of college-ready students;
and
(8) Support students participating in the Smart Core by
providing a baseline for their college and workforce readiness and an
opportunity to benefit from earlier remediation or course selection review;
and
(9) Provide a link between what students have learned, what they
need to learn, and what is necessary in order to be college or workforce
ready, or both, by providing expectations and measuring their progress.

6-18-1605. Smart Core and ACT Assessment.
(a) The General Assembly finds that students who take the recommended
Smart Core courses or students who take additional courses after completing
the Smart Core continue to perform better on the ACT Assessment than students
who take less than the recommended core.
(b) The recommended core courses according to ACT Assessment officials
include:
(1) Four (4) years or more of English;
(2) Three (3) years or more of mathematics;
(3) Three (3) years or more of social studies; and
(4) Three (3) years or more of natural sciences.

6-18-1606. Implementation.
(a) Beginning with the 2017-2018 2025-2026 school year, the Universal
ACT Assessment Program may provide each student in grades nine (9), ten (10),
eleven (11), or twelve (12) with the opportunity to take the ACT Assessment
03-04-2025 14:06:59 TNL050

As Engrossed: S2/4/25 S2/25/25 S2/25/25 S3/4/25 SB183
an assessment while in grades nine (9), ten (10), eleven (11), or twelve (12)
without any charge by using school district funding provided to public school
districts and open-enrollment public charter schools, including without
limitation National School Lunch Act funds, 42 U.S.C. § 1751 et seq., to pay
for the exams assessments as approved by the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education.
(b) A Each public school district and open-enrollment public charter
school shall allow a student to choose to take the ACT Assessment the
following assessments under subsection (a) of this section in grade ten (10)
or grade eleven (11):
(1) One (1) of the following in grades nine (9) or ten (10):
(A) The PreACT;
(B) The PSAT 8/9;
(C) The Preliminary SAT/National Merit Scholarship
Qualifying Test;
(D) The PreACT 8/9;
(E) The PSAT 10; or
(F) The CLT 10; and
(2) One (1) of the following in grade eleven (11):
(A) The ACT;
(B) The SAT; or
(C) The CLT.
(c) A public school district or an open-enrollment public charter
school shall offer and enable a student, upon the student's request, to take
the Armed Services Vocational Aptitude Battery at the public school district
or open-enrollment public charter school."

6-18-1607. Rules.
The Division of Higher Education and the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education shall develop rules for the administration of this
subchapter.

6-18-1608. Reporting.
The Division of Higher Education and the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education shall submit a combined annual report to the Legislative
Council by December 1 of each year that establishes:
03-04-2025 14:06:59 TNL050

As Engrossed: S2/4/25 S2/25/25 S2/25/25 S3/4/25 SB183
(1) Establishes compliance with this subchapter, provides;
(2) Provides data on the number of participants in the Universal
ACT Assessment Program,; and outlines
(3) Outlines the impact of this program on the college readiness
of high school seniors and the remediation rates at institutions of higher
education.

/s/J. Dotson




























03-04-2025 14:06:59 TNL050